Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB548.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 365 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Prohibited advertisement" means any written or electronic
communications by a contractor that encourages, instructs, or induces a
residential property owner to contact any insurance company personnel for
the purpose of making an insurance claim for roof damage. This includes
but is not limited to door hangers, business cards, magnets, flyers,
pamphlets, and emails; and
(b) "Solicit" means to contact a residential property owner in person or
through electronic means, including but not limited to email or telephone.
(2) A person shall not:
(a) Solicit a residential property owner by means of a prohibited advertisement;
(b) Offer a residential property owner a rebate, gift card, cash, coupon, waiver
of any insurance deductible, or any other thing of value in exchange for:
1. Allowing the person or his or her agent to conduct an inspection of the
residential property owner's roof; or
2. Making an insurance claim for damage to the residential property
owner's roof in a way that purports to interpret an insurance policy;
(c) Offer, deliver, receive, or accept any compensation, inducement, or reward
for the referral of any work to a business or person that performs repair
work services on residential property for which insurance proceeds are
payable; or
(d) Provide an insured with an agreement authorizing repairs without
providing a good-faith estimate of the itemized and detailed cost of services
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/3/2025 3:38 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1064
and materials for repairs undertaken pursuant to a property insurance
claim. If the actual cost of repairs differs from the initial estimate as a result
of an insurer adjusting the claim, it shall not be a violation of this
subsection.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/3/2025 3:38 PM Jacketed